incubator/apertium-la-es/apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="hom/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inis</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inem</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inibus</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inibus</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dom/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Declension 1 -->
    <pardef n="aqu/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="abbatia"><i>abbati</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ala"><i>al</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amita"><i>amit</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ansa"><i>ans</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arca"><i>arc</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aristocratia"><i>aristocrati</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barba"><i>barb</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stella"><i>stell</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homo"><i>hom</i><par n="hom/o__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="adolescentia"><i>adolescenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="amentia"><i>amenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="angustia"><i>angusti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="arista"><i>arist</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="audentia"><i>audenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="avaritia"><i>avariti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="benivolentia"><i>benivolenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="camera"><i>camer</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="casa"><i>cas</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="catena"><i>caten</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="causa"><i>caus</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="cellula"><i>cellul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="colonia"><i>coloni</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="concupiscentia"><i>concupiscenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="contumelia"><i>contumeli</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="cura"><i>cur</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="diligentia"><i>diligenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="domina"><i>domin</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aeclesia"><i>aeclesi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="fabella"><i>fabell</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="famula"><i>famul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="forma"><i>form</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="gloria"><i>glori</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ignavia"><i>ignavi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="iniuria"><i>iniuri</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="inperitia"><i>inperiti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="invidia"><i>invidi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="laetitia"><i>laetiti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="luna"><i>lun</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="malitia"><i>maliti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="medulla"><i>medull</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="miseria"><i>miseri</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="nebula"><i>nebul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="omnipotentia"><i>omnipotenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="pecunia"><i>pecuni</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="pervicacia"><i>pervicaci</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="pila"><i>pil</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="potentia"><i>potenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="prudentia"><i>prudenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="pugna"><i>pugn</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ripa"><i>rip</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="saevitia"><i>saeviti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="scaena"><i>scaen</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="sententia"><i>sententi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="statua"><i>statu</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="suaviloquentia"><i>suaviloquenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="syllaba"><i>syllab</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="taverna"><i>tavern</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="tristitia"><i>tristiti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="umbra"><i>umbr</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="urnula"><i>urnul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="via"><i>vi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="villa"><i>vill</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abstantia"><i>abstanti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acupunctura"><i>acupunctur</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aedificatoria"><i>aedificatori</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="allegoria"><i>allegori</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angina"><i>angin</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apstinentia"><i>apstinenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autobiographia"><i>autobiographi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baronia"><i>baroni</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biosphaera"><i>biosphaer</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cellula"><i>cellul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="criminologia"><i>criminologi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diarrhoea"><i>diarrhoe</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drachuma"><i>drachum</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="efficacia"><i>efficaci</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="endivia"><i>endivi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ethnologia"><i>ethnologi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="excellentia"><i>excellenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feministria"><i>feministri</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geographia"><i>geographi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gratia"><i>grati</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heterogenia"><i>heterogeni</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="physica"><i>physic</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="domus"><i>dom</i><par n="dom/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="catechismus"><i>catechism</i><par n="dom/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="domus"><i>vult</i><par n="dom/us__n"/></e>
